Vermont, session 2025-2026, H258.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT; JUVENILE INTERROGATION; LAW
ENFORCEMENT INTERROGATION POLICIES
It is the intent of the General Assembly to prevent false confessions and
wrongful convictions of individuals subject to law enforcement interrogation
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 2 of 14
and to improve trust between Vermont’s communities and law enforcement.
To achieve these objectives, it is the further intent of the General Assembly to
create a minimum set of law enforcement interrogation standards that
incorporate evidence-based best practices by:
(1) requiring that a juvenile’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian obtain
notice and contact with the juvenile prior to any custodial interrogation;
(2) prohibiting law enforcement’s use of threats, physical harm, and
deception during custodial interrogations of persons under 22 years of age; and
(3) mandating that the Vermont Criminal Justice Council develop,
adopt, and enforce a statewide model interrogation policy that applies to all
Vermont law enforcement agencies and constables exercising law enforcement
authority pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 1936a.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 5585 is amended to read:
§ 5585. ELECTRONIC RECORDING OF A CUSTODIAL
INTERROGATION DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this section subchapter:
(1) “Custodial interrogation” means any interrogation:
(A) involving questioning by a law enforcement officer that is
reasonably likely to elicit an incriminating response from the subject; and
(B) in which a reasonable person in the subject’s position would
consider the person to be in custody, starting from the moment a person should
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 3 of 14
have been advised of the person’s Miranda rights and ending when the
questioning has concluded.
(2) “Deception” includes the knowing communication of false facts
about evidence, the knowing misrepresentation of the accuracy of the facts, the
knowing misrepresentation of the law, or the knowing communication of
unauthorized statements regarding leniency.
(2)(3) “Electronic recording” or “electronically recorded” means an
audio and visual recording that is an authentic, accurate, unaltered record of a
custodial interrogation, or if law enforcement does not have the current
capacity to create a visual recording, an audio recording of the interrogation.
(4) “Government agent” means:
(A) a school resource or safety officer; or
(B) an individual acting at the request or direction of a school
resource or safety officer or a law enforcement officer.
(5) “Interested adult” means a person who is 18 years of age or older
and genuinely interested in the welfare of a juvenile subject to custodial
interrogation but is completely independent from and dissociated with the
prosecution in accordance with In re E.T.C., 141 Vt. 375, 378 (1982).
(6) “Law enforcement officer” has the same meaning as in 20 V.S.A.
§ 2351a.
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 4 of 14
(3)(7) “Place of detention” means a building or a police station that is a
place of operation for the State police, a municipal police department, county
sheriff department, or other law enforcement agency that is owned or operated
by a law enforcement agency at which persons are or may be questioned in
connection with criminal offenses or detained temporarily in connection with
criminal charges pending a potential arrest or citation.
(4)(8) “Statement” means an oral, written, sign language, or nonverbal
communication.
(b)(1) A custodial interrogation that occurs in a place of detention
concerning the investigation of a felony or misdemeanor violation of this title
shall be electronically recorded in its entirety. Unless impracticable, a custodial
interrogation occurring outside a place of detention concerning the
investigation of a felony or misdemeanor violation of this title shall be
electronically recorded in its entirety.
(2) In consideration of best practices, law enforcement shall strive to
record simultaneously both the interrogator and the person being interrogated.
(c)(1) The following are exceptions to the recording requirement in
subsection (b) of this section:
(A) exigent circumstances;
(B) a person’s refusal to be electronically recorded;
(C) interrogations conducted by other jurisdictions;
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 5 of 14
(D) a reasonable belief that the person being interrogated did not
commit a felony or misdemeanor violation of this title and, therefore, an
electronic recording of the interrogation was not required;
(E) the safety of a person or protection of the person’s identity; and
(F) equipment malfunction.
(2) If law enforcement does not make an electronic recording of a
custodial interrogation as required by this section, the prosecution shall prove
by a preponderance of the evidence that one of the exceptions identified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection applies. If the prosecution does not meet the
burden of proof, the evidence is still admissible, but the court shall provide
cautionary instructions to the jury regarding the failure to record the
interrogation.
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 5586 is added to read:
§ 5586. ELECTRONIC RECORDING OF A CUSTODIAL
INTERROGATION
(a)(1) A custodial interrogation that occurs in a place of detention
concerning the investigation of a felony or misdemeanor violation of this title
shall be electronically recorded in its entirety. Unless impracticable, a
custodial interrogation occurring outside a place of detention concerning the
investigation of a felony or misdemeanor violation of this title shall be
electronically recorded in its entirety.
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 6 of 14
(2) In consideration of best practices, law enforcement shall strive to
record simultaneously both the interrogator and the person being interrogated.
(b)(1) The following are exceptions to the recording requirement in
subsection (a) of this section:
(A) exigent circumstances;
(B) a person’s refusal to be electronically recorded;
(C) interrogations conducted by other jurisdictions;
(D) a reasonable belief that the person being interrogated did not
commit a felony or misdemeanor violation of this title and, therefore, an
electronic recording of the interrogation was not required;
(E) the safety of a person or protection of the person’s identity; and
(F) equipment malfunction.
(2) If law enforcement does not make an electronic recording of a
custodial interrogation as required by this section, the prosecution shall prove
by a preponderance of the evidence that one of the exceptions identified in
subdivision (1) of this subsection applies. If the prosecution does not meet the
burden of proof, the evidence is still admissible, but the court shall provide
cautionary instructions to the jury regarding the failure to record the
interrogation.
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 7 of 14
Sec. 4. 13 V.S.A. § 5587 is added to read:
§ 5587. CUSTODIAL INTERROGATION; JUVENILES; INTERESTED
ADULT; NOTICE, CONSULTATION, AND PRESENCE
(a)(1) Prior to any custodial interrogation of a person under 18 years of age
by a law enforcement officer or government agent, the person’s interested
adult shall be notified of the person’s arrest.
(2) The interested adult shall have contact with the person’s parent or
guardian prior to the commencement of any custodial interrogation, if the
interested adult is not the person’s parent or guardian themselves.
(b) The interested adult shall be present during the entirety of any custodial
interrogation of a person under 18 years of age.
(c) The notification and contact required by subsection (a) of this section
shall be effectuated by an in-person meeting or by electronic, telephonic, or
videographic conference.
Sec. 5. 13 V.S.A. § 5588 is added to read:
§ 5588. CUSTODIAL INTERROGATION; JUVENILES; PROHIBITIONS;
INADMISSIBILITY
(a) During a custodial interrogation of a person under 22 years of age
relating to the commission of a criminal offense or delinquent act, a law
enforcement officer or government agent shall not employ threats, physical
harm, or deception.
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 8 of 14
(b)(1) Any admission, confession, or statement, whether written or oral,
made by a person under 22 years of age and obtained in violation of subsection
(a) of this section shall be presumed to be involuntary and inadmissible in any
proceeding.
(2) The presumption that any such admission, confession, or statement
is involuntary and inadmissible may be overcome if the State proves by clear
and convincing evidence that the admission, confession, or statement was:
(A) voluntary and not induced by a law enforcement officer’s or
government agent’s use of threats, physical harm, or deception prohibited by
subsection (a) of this section; and
(B) any actions of a law enforcement officer or government agent in
violation of subsection (a) of this section did not undermine the reliability of
the person’s admission, confession, or statement and did not create a
substantial risk that the person might falsely incriminate themselves.
Sec. 6. VERMONT CRIMINAL JUSTICE COUNCIL; MODEL
INTERROGATION POLICY
(a) Intent. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Vermont
Criminal Justice Council create a model interrogation policy that is grounded
in evidence-based best practices to limit and eventually eliminate the use of
deception in law enforcement interrogations.
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 9 of 14
(b) Policy development. On or before January 1, 2026, the Vermont
Criminal Justice Council, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney
General and stakeholders, including the Agency of Human Services, the
Vermont League of Cities and Towns, the Vermont Human Rights
Commission, and the Innocence Project, shall establish one cohesive evidence-
based model interrogation policy for law enforcement agencies and constables
to adopt, follow, and enforce as part of the agency’s or constable’s own
interrogation policy.
(c) Policy contents. The evidence-based model interrogation policy created
pursuant to this section shall apply to all persons subject to various forms of
interrogation, including the following:
(1) custodial interrogations occurring in a place of detention;
(2) custodial interrogations occurring outside a place of detention;
(3) interrogations that are not considered custodial, regardless of
location; and
(4) the interrogation of individuals with developmental, intellectual, and
psychiatric disabilities; substance use disorders; and low literacy levels.
Sec. 7. 20 V.S.A. § 2359 is amended to read:
§ 2359. COUNCIL SERVICES CONTINGENT ON AGENCY
COMPLIANCE; GRANT ELIGIBILITY
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 10 of 14
(a) On and after January 1, 2022, a law enforcement agency shall be
prohibited from having its law enforcement applicants or officers trained by
the Police Academy or from otherwise using the services of the Council if the
agency is not in compliance with the requirements for collecting roadside stop
data under section 2366 of this chapter, the requirement to report to the Office
of Attorney General death or serious bodily injuries under 18 V.S.A.
§ 7257a(b), or the requirement to adopt, follow, or and enforce any policy
required under this chapter.
(b) On and after April 1, 2026, a law enforcement agency shall be
prohibited from receiving grants, or other forms of financial assistance, if the
agency is not in compliance with the requirement to adopt, follow, and enforce
the model interrogation policy established by the Council pursuant to section
2372 of this title.
(c) The Council shall adopt procedures to enforce the requirements of this
section, which may allow for waivers for agencies under a plan to obtain
compliance with this section.
Sec. 8. 20 V.S.A. § 2372 is added to read:
§ 2372. STATEWIDE POLICY; INTERROGATION METHODS
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Custodial interrogation” has the same meaning as in 13 V.S.A.
§ 5585.
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 11 of 14
(2) “Place of detention” has the same meaning as in 13 V.S.A. § 5585.
(b) The Council shall establish a model interrogation policy that applies to
all persons subject to various forms of interrogation, including the following:
(1) custodial interrogations occurring in a place of detention;
(2) custodial interrogations occurring outside a place of detention;
(3) interrogations that are not considered custodial, regardless of
location; and
(4) the interrogation of individuals with developmental, intellectual, and
psychiatric disabilities; substance use disorders; and low literacy levels.
(c)(1) On or before April 1, 2026, each law enforcement agency and every
constable who exercises law enforcement authority pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
§ 1936a and who is trained in compliance with section 2358 of this title shall
adopt, follow, and enforce an interrogation policy that includes each
component of the model interrogation policy established by the Council, and
each law enforcement officer or constable who exercises law enforcement
authority shall comply with the provisions of the agency’s or constable’s
policy.
(2) On or before October 1, 2026, and every even-numbered year
thereafter, the Vermont Criminal Justice Council, in consultation with others,
including the Office of the Attorney General, the Agency of Human Services,
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 12 of 14
and the Human Rights Commission, shall review and, if necessary, update the
model interrogation policy.
(d) To encourage fair and consistent interrogation methods statewide, the
Vermont Criminal Justice Council, in consultation with the Office of the
Attorney General, shall review the policies of law enforcement agencies and
constables required to adopt a policy pursuant to subsection (c) of this section,
to ensure that those policies establish each component of the model policy on
or before April 15, 2026. If the Council finds that a policy does not meet each
component of the model policy, it shall work with the law enforcement agency
or constable to bring the policy into compliance. If, after consultation with its
attorney or with the Council, or with both, the law enforcement agency or
constable fails to adopt a policy that meets each component of the model
policy, that agency or constable shall be deemed to have adopted, and shall
follow and enforce, the model policy established by the Council.
(e) The Council shall incorporate the provisions of this section into the
training it provides.
(f) Annually, as part of their annual training report to the Council, every
law enforcement agency and every constable who exercises law enforcement
authority pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 1936a and who is trained in compliance with
section 2358 of this title shall report to the Council whether the agency or
constable has adopted an interrogation policy in accordance with subsections
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 13 of 14
(c) and (d) of this section. The Vermont Criminal Justice Council shall
determine, as part of the Council’s annual certification of training
requirements, whether current officers have received training on interrogation
methods as required by subsection (e) of this section.
(g) Annually, on or before July 1, the Vermont Criminal Justice Council
shall report to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary regarding which
law enforcement agencies and officers have received training on interrogation
methods.
Sec. 9. VERMONT CRIMINAL JUSTICE COUNCIL; POSITION;
APPROPRIATION
(a) On July 1, 2025, a new, permanent, classified Director of Policy
position is created in the Vermont Criminal Justice Council. In addition to any
other duties deemed appropriate by the Council, the Director of Policy shall
supervise the development, oversight, and compliance work related to the
Council’s internal, external, and State-mandated policies.
(b) The position of Director of Policy established in subsection (a) of this
section shall be subject to a General Fund appropriation in fiscal year 2026.
Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, except that Secs. 4 (juvenile
custodial interrogation; notice and contact with parent, custodian, or legal
guardian), 5 (juvenile custodial interrogation; prohibitions; inadmissibility),
VT LEG #379628 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.258
2025 Page 14 of 14
7 (council services contingent on Agency compliance; grant eligibility), and
8 (statewide policy; interrogation methods) shall take effect on April 1, 2026.
VT LEG #379628 v.1